Hawaii statutes.
§431:5-302 Unearned premium reserve for
marine and transportation. Marine and transportation insurance policy
premiums on trip risks not terminated shall be deemed unearned. The
commissioner may require the insurer to carry a reserve equal to one hundred
per cent on trip risks written during the month ended as of the date of
statement, and:

(1) Computed upon a pro rata basis; or

(2) With the commissioner's consent, in accordance
with the alternative methods provided in section 431:5-301(c) and section
431:5-301(d). [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 1997, c 368, §5]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next